Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 75 O.S. 2021, Section 308, as


amended by Section 5, Chapter 38, O.S.L. 2023 (75 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 308), is amended to read as follows:


Section 308. A. Upon receipt of any proposed permanent rules,


the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro


Tempore of the Senate shall assign such rules to the appropriate


committees of each house of the Legislature for review. Except as


otherwise provided by this section:


1. If such rules are received on or before April 1, the


Legislature shall have until the last day of the regular legislative


Req. No. 210 Page 1


session of that year to review such rules. Provided, proposed


permanent rules for consideration by the 2nd Session of the 59th


Legislature shall be submitted on or before March 1. For each


legislative session thereafter, proposed permanent rules shall be


submitted on or before February 1 of the given year; and


2. If such rules are received after the date established


pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection, the Legislature shall


have until the last day of the regular legislative session of the


next year to act on such rules.


B. By the adoption of joint resolutions during the review


period specified in subsection A of this section, the Legislature


may disapprove or approve any rule and disapprove all or part of a


rule or rules. Any rules not acted upon by the adoption of a joint


resolution shall be deemed disapproved.


C. Unless otherwise authorized by the Legislature, whenever a


rule is disapproved as provided in subsection B of this section, the


agency adopting such rules shall not have authority to resubmit an


identical rule, except during the first sixty (60) calendar days of


the next regular legislative session. Any effective emergency rule


which would have been superseded by a disapproved permanent rule


shall be deemed null and void on the date the Legislature


disapproves the permanent rule. Rules may be disapproved in part or


in whole by the Legislature. Upon enactment of any joint resolution


disapproving a rule, the agency shall file notice of such

Req. No. 210 Page 2


legislative disapproval with the Secretary for publication in “The


Oklahoma Register”.


D. Unless otherwise provided by specific vote of the


Legislature, joint resolutions introduced for purposes of


disapproving or approving a rule or the omnibus joint resolution


described in Section 308.3 of this title shall not be subject to


regular legislative cutoff dates, shall be limited to such


provisions as may be necessary for disapproval or approval of a


rule, and any such other direction or mandate regarding the rule


deemed necessary by the Legislature. The resolution shall contain


no other provisions.


E. A proposed permanent rule shall only be deemed finally


adopted if:


1. Approved by the Legislature pursuant to Section 308.3 of


this title, provided that any such joint resolution becomes law in


accordance with Section 11 of Article VI of the Oklahoma


Constitution;


2. Approved by a joint resolution pursuant to subsection B of


this section, provided that any such resolution becomes law in


accordance with Section 11 of Article VI of the Oklahoma


Constitution; or


3. Disapproved by a joint resolution pursuant to subsection B


of this section or Section 308.3 of this title which has been vetoed



Req. No. 210 Page 3


by the Governor in accordance with Section 11 of Article VI of the


Oklahoma Constitution and the veto has not been overridden.


F. Prior to final adoption of a rule, an agency may withdraw a


rule from legislative review. Notice of such withdrawal shall be


given to the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives,


the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and to the Secretary for


publication in “The Oklahoma Register”.


G. An agency may promulgate an emergency rule only pursuant to


Section 253 of this title.


H. Any rights, privileges, or interests gained by any person by


operation of an emergency rule, shall not be affected by reason of


any subsequent disapproval or rejection of such rule by either house


of the Legislature.


SECTION 2. REPEALER 75 O.S. 2021, Section 308.3, as


amended by Section 6, Chapter 38, O.S.L. 2023 (75 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 308.3), is hereby repealed.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-210 RD 1/16/2025 2:28:13 PM





Req. No. 210 Page 4